Maine, session 132, LD1307.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Temporary suspension of mandatory payroll premiums for paid
family and medical leave benefits program. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 26, section 850-F, subsection 2, the mandatory remittance by an employer
of the payroll premium imposed pursuant to Title 26, section 850-F, subsection 3 to support
the paid family and medical leave benefits program established in Title 26, section 850-B
is suspended until January 1, 2026. An employer that wishes to continue participation in
the program may continue to pay the payroll premium required by Title 26, section 850-F,
subsection 2.
Sec. 2. Rules establishing expedited exemption process and waiver of
payroll premiums. Pursuant to its rule-making authority under the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 26, section 850-Q, the Department of Labor shall amend 12-702 C.M.R.
Chapter 1: Rules governing the Maine Paid Family and Medical Leave Program to
implement an expedited approval process for private plans that meet the requirements of
Title 26, section 850-H. The rules must allow an employer that applies for an exemption
from the plan to discontinue the payment of the payroll premium imposed pursuant to Title
26, section 850-F, subsection 3 while the application is pending. The rules must be in effect
no later than November 1, 2025.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.